Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 44
DIVISION OF FINANCIAL SERVICES

Section

11-44-101. Division of financial services created.

There is created a division of financial services in the department of regulatory agencies, which shall be administered by the state commissioner of financial services. When any law of this state refers to the savings and loan department of the state of Colorado, said law shall be construed as referring to the division of financial services. The division of financial services and the office of the state commissioner of financial services are

type 2

entities, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 331, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-1.

L. 68:

p. 125, § 126.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 616, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3391, § 104, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

11-44-101.4. Definitions.

As used in articles 30 and 40 to 46 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires, "board" means the financial services board, created in section 11-44-101.6.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1447, § 9, effective June 6.

11-44-101.5. Division subject to termination - repeal of article.

The provisions of section 24-34-104, C.R.S., concerning the termination schedule for regulatory bodies of the state unless extended as provided in that section, are applicable to the division of financial services created by section 11-44-101.

This article is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 621, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 616, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 678, § 6, effective April 20.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 66, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 138, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-159), ch. 193, p. 790, § 1, effective May 11.

11-44-101.6. Financial services board - creation - penalty.

There is established in the division of financial services the financial services board, which consists of five members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The financial services board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

There shall be three members who during their tenure are, and shall remain, executive officers of state credit unions and shall have not less than five years' practical experience as an active executive officer of a credit union.

There shall be one member who during such member's tenure is, and shall remain, the executive officer of a state savings and loan association and shall have not less than five years' practical experience as an active executive officer of a savings and loan association.

There shall also be one member to serve as a public member of the board who shall have expertise in finance through current experience in business, industry, agriculture, or education.

Not more than three members shall be of the same major political party. No member of the board shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in a financial institution in which another member of the board shall have any such interest.

The term of office of each member is four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. The governor may, after notice and hearing, remove a member for cause. Any board member who is absent from three consecutive board meetings is subject to immediate removal by the governor.

Each member of the board shall receive the same per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as those provided for members of boards and commissions in the division of professions and occupations pursuant to section 12-20-103 (6). Payment for all such expenses and allowances shall be made upon vouchers therefor, which shall be filed with the department of personnel.

The board shall meet at least once every three months. The chair of the board may call additional meetings of the board upon at least seventy-two hours' notice to all members of the board and shall do so upon the request of two members. All members of the board shall be subject to immediate call in the event of an emergency. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and action taken by a majority of those present at any meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the action of the board. Upon the affirmative vote of a majority of those present at any meeting at which a quorum is present, one or more members may be authorized to conduct any hearing required under articles 30 and 40 to 46 of this title. In the event that less than a quorum of the board is present during the conduct of the hearing, at least a quorum of the board shall read the entire record before voting thereon. No member who is, or was at any time in the preceding twelve months, a director, officer, partner, employee, member, or stockholder of a corporation, partnership, or unincorporated association which is a party to a proceeding before the board shall participate in such a proceeding. A member may disqualify himself or herself from participating in a proceeding for any other cause deemed by the member to be sufficient.

A quorum may be established by means of a conference telephone call which shall be recorded in the board's minutes. Upon the affirmative vote of a majority of those present at any meeting at which a quorum is present, the board may hold an executive session to consider certain matters required by statute to be kept confidential under articles 30 and 40 to 46 of this title. Any agenda and the minutes of executive sessions shall be kept confidential by the board.

Such clerical, technical, and legal assistance as the board may require shall be provided by the division.

The members of the board shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, in addition to any oath required by the state constitution, take and subscribe an oath to keep secret all information acquired by them in the discharge of their duties, except as may be otherwise required by law. Any person who willfully violates this oath commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

The board shall elect a chair from among its members to serve for a term not exceeding two years, as determined by the board. No chair shall be eligible to serve as such for more than two successive terms. In addition to the amounts received pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the chair shall receive per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses in the amounts provided by section 12-20-103 (6) for each day spent in attending to the duties of the board.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1447, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 637, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 1513, § 40, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

(4) and (9) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1659, § 58, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(8) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3151, § 125, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1) and (3) amended and (10) repealed, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 8, § 8, effective February 25; (1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3391, § 105, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by SB 22-013 and SB 22-162 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

11-44-101.7. Powers of the financial services board.

The board is the policy-making and rule-making authority for the division and has the power to:

Regulate its own procedure and practice; and

Make, modify, reverse, and vacate rules for the proper enforcement and administration of articles 30, 40 to 46, and 49 of this title 11.

In addition to any other powers conferred on it by articles 30, 40 to 46, and 49 of this title 11, the board has the power to:

Make all final decisions with respect to the organization, conversion, or merger of credit unions and savings and loan associations and administration of life care institutions or providers pursuant to article 49 of this title 11;

Make all final decisions with respect to the suspension or liquidation of credit unions and savings and loan associations under article 30 of this title and this article.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 1092, § 3, effective May 31, 1995.)

The board has the power to:

Prohibit the taking of shares or deposits or to restrict the withdrawal of shares or deposits, or both, from any one or more state credit unions or savings and loan associations when the board finds that extraordinary circumstances make such a restriction necessary for the proper protection of depositors in the affected state credit union or savings and loan association;

Authorize state credit unions and savings and loan associations to engage in any activity in which such financial institutions could engage were they operating under a federal charter or certificate of approval at the time such authority is granted, so long as such activity is not prohibited by state law and to the extent permissible under the rules and regulations of the board;

Affirm, modify, reverse, vacate, or stay the enforcement of any order, ruling, or determination made by the commissioner acting pursuant to authority delegated by the board;

Issue a declaratory order with respect to the applicability of articles 30, 40 to 46, and 49 of this title 11, or any rule issued by the board to any person, property, or state of facts under said provisions;

Review and comment on the preliminary budget draft for the division prior to its submission to the department of regulatory agencies;

Annually establish such fees and assessments and the percentages thereof as are necessary to generate the moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the division;

Comment to the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies on who shall be the commissioner and to recommend to said executive director the termination of the commissioner for cause;

Perform any acts and make any decisions incidental to or necessary for carrying out its functions as set forth in articles 30, 40 to 46, and 49 of this title 11;

Issue subpoenas and require attendance of any and all officers, directors, and employees of any credit union, savings and loan association, or life care institution or provider, and such other witnesses as the board may deem necessary in relation to its affairs, transactions, and conditions, and may require such witnesses to appear and answer such questions as may be put to them by the board, and may require such witnesses to produce such books, papers, or documents in their possession as may be required by the board. Upon application of the board and subject to any protective order which may be entered by a district court, any person served with a subpoena issued by the board may be required, by order of the district court of the county where the credit union, savings and loan association, or life care institution or provider has its principal office, to appear and answer such questions as may be put to such person by the board and be required to produce such books, papers, or documents in such person's possession as may be required by the board.

The board may issue cease-and-desist orders, suspend a director, officer, or employee of a credit union or savings and loan association, or assess civil money penalties, in the same manner as provided in section 11-30-106 (7) and (8), concerning powers of the commissioner, and section 11-44-106.5, concerning suspension or removal of directors, officers, or employees, and as provided in sections 11-30-106.5 and 11-44-123, concerning assessment of civil money penalties by the commissioner.

Except with respect to the organization of community charter credit unions, the board may, in its discretion, delegate to the commissioner any of its powers, duties, and functions.

The board may, in its discretion, require the commissioner to report to the board periodically with respect to any powers delegated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

The board shall have the power to approve or deny merger agreements for credit unions as provided in section 11-30-122. Mergers involving a community charter shall be subject to a public hearing pursuant to section 11-30-101.7.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1449, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(3)(b) amended and (8) repealed, pp. 66, 67, §§ 10, 11, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2)(a), (2)(c), (3)(d), and (3)(h) amended, p. 1092, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 1011, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2013:

(3)(i) amended, (SB 13-159), ch. 193, p. 791, § 5, effective May 11.

L. 2017:

(1)(b), IP(2), (2)(a), (3)(d), and (3)(h) amended, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 589, § 4, effective August 9.

11-44-101.8. Review of commissioner actions by financial services board - judicial review.

Any credit union, savings and loan association, or life care institution or provider, or any officer, director, employee, agent, advisor, or volunteer thereof, may appeal to the board any actions taken pursuant to authority delegated by the board pursuant to section 11-44-101.7 (5) or as otherwise specifically provided by statute. Notice of such appeal shall be filed with the commissioner within thirty days after such findings, ruling, order, decision, or other action. Such notice shall contain a brief statement of the pertinent facts upon which such appeal is based. Within sixty days after the appeal is filed, the board shall fix a date, time, and place for hearing the appeal and shall notify the credit union, savings and loan association, or life care institution or provider at least thirty days prior to the date of said hearing. Any such action of the commissioner may be stayed by the board pending the appeal to the board. The findings, order, decision, ruling, or other action of the board shall be deemed final agency action.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the board, any hearing conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the board be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from an institution.

Any credit union, savings and loan association, or life care institution or provider, or any officer, director, employee, agent, advisor, or volunteer thereof, or any other party, aggrieved or directly affected by a final order of the board, may obtain judicial review thereof by filing an action for review pursuant to the provisions of section 24-4-106, C.R.S., with the Colorado court of appeals pursuant to section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S. The commencement of such proceeding does not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the board's ruling, order, decision, or other action.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1451, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 67, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 1092, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 8, § 1, effective March 13.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 1011, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 138, § 21, effective July 1.

11-44-102. Commissioner - duties - employees.

The head of the division of financial services shall be the state commissioner of financial services, referred to in this article as the "commissioner". The commissioner shall have had at least five years' practical experience in the operation or regulation of financial institutions or financial service operations. The commissioner shall be appointed by the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution.

The commissioner may appoint, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, a deputy commissioner of financial services, a secretary, and such other employees as deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the division.

The deputy commissioner, the secretary, and all other employees of the division shall be under the direct supervision of the commissioner who shall have full power and control over such employees. Neither the commissioner nor any officer or employee of the division shall be personally liable for any acts done in good faith while in the performance of his duties as prescribed by law.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 138, § 22, effective July 1, 2004.)

The commissioner, the deputy commissioner, the secretary, and all employees shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses of their office, including all traveling expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties, upon vouchers therefor properly itemized and filed in accordance with law.

Repealed.

Neither the commissioner nor any employee of the division shall:

Be an officer, director, committee member, attorney for, or stockholder in any credit union or savings and loan association; or

Receive, directly or indirectly, any payment, gratuity, or compensation from any institution over which the division has regulatory authority.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (8) shall not prohibit the commissioner or any employee of the division from being a depositor, account holder, borrower, or user of other available financial services on the same terms as are available to the general public or membership.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (8) to the contrary, this subsection (8) shall not prohibit the credit union or savings and loan members of the financial services board pursuant to section 11-44-101.6 (2)(a) or (2)(b) from:

Being executive officers in credit unions or savings and loan associations; and

Receiving bona fide compensation as such officers.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 332, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 48.

L. 43:

p. 207, § 6.

L. 47:

p. 315, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-2.

L. 68:

p. 125, § 127.

L. 89:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 616, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(7) added, p. 674, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), and (5) amended and (8) added, p. 138, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4) repealed, (SB 13-159), ch. 193, p. 791, § 6, effective May 11.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (7), effective January 1, 1992. (See L. 91, p. 674.)

11-44-103. Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has general supervision and control over all domestic and foreign savings and loan associations doing business in this state and has full power to grant, refuse, or revoke a permit or license to any association to do business in this state when such association is not conducting its business in conformity with the laws of the state or is conducting its business in such an unsafe manner as to render its further operations hazardous to the public or any of its shareholders. All articles of incorporation and amendments thereto, all bylaws and amendments thereto, and all certificates of stock and shares of associations subject to articles 40 to 46 of this title shall be submitted to said commissioner for his approval or disapproval, and said commissioner has the authority to approve, modify, or reject any such articles of incorporation or amendments thereto, bylaws or amendments thereto, and certificates of stock or shares. The commissioner has full power and authority to prescribe all necessary and proper rules and regulations for the conduct and operation of savings and loan associations in this state and shall prescribe the manner in which the books and records of associations doing business in this state shall be kept.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 334, § 3.

CSA:

C. 25, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-3.

11-44-103.5. Record retention by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall retain records pursuant to part 1 of article 80 of title 24, C.R.S., and may, in his or her discretion, destroy records pursuant to said part 1.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 139, § 23, effective July 1.

11-44-104. Commissioner may delegate powers.

The commissioner may delegate such of his powers and authority to his deputies as he may deem necessary for proper administration of the division and may designate appropriate titles for his deputies and any of his employees. Any such delegation or designation made may be rescinded by the commissioner at any time. All such actions shall be in writing and of record in the files of the division. The acts of deputies performing such delegated powers and authority shall be of the same legal effect as if performed personally by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 250, § 21.

CSA:

C. 25, § 49(1).

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-4.

11-44-105. Commissioner may institute suits.

The commissioner shall report to the attorney general, and he shall institute and prosecute suits and actions to enjoin violations of articles 40 to 46 of this title or violations of orders or decisions of the commissioner rendered pursuant to said articles and to enforce any civil penalties provided by said articles. The commissioner shall notify the proper district attorney of any violation of the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title which constitutes a felony or misdemeanor, and such district attorney shall forthwith prosecute the person charged with such offense. Upon failure or refusal of the district attorney to so prosecute, it shall be the duty of the attorney general to conduct such prosecution.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 335, § 4.

CSA:

C. 25, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-5.

11-44-106. Issuance of subpoenas.

The commissioner has the power to issue subpoenas and require attendance of any and all officers, directors, agents, salesmen, collectors, and employees of any association and such other witnesses as he may deem necessary in relation to its affairs, transactions, and conditions, and may require such witnesses to appear and answer such questions as may be put to them by the commissioner, and may require such witnesses to produce such books, papers, or documents in their possession as may be required by the commissioner. Upon application of the commissioner, any person served with a subpoena issued by him may be required, by order of the district court of the county where the association has its principal office, to appear and answer such questions as may be put to him by the commissioner and be required to produce such books, papers, or documents in his possession as may be required by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 336, § 5.

CSA:

C. 25, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-6.

11-44-106.5. Suspension or removal of directors, officers, or employees - penalty.

The commissioner may suspend or remove any director, officer, or employee of an association who in the opinion of the commissioner has:

Violated the savings and loan association laws or a lawful regulation or order issued thereunder;

Engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound practice in the conduct of savings and loan business;

Committed or engaged in any act, omission, or practice which constitutes a breach of fiduciary duty to the association and the association has suffered or will probably suffer financial loss or other damage or the interests of account holders may be seriously prejudiced thereby; or

Received financial gain by reason of a violation, practice, or breach of fiduciary duty that involved personal dishonesty or demonstrated a willful or continuing disregard for the safety or soundness of the association.

The commissioner may suspend or remove any director, officer, or employee of an association who, under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state or territory of the United States:

Has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to or been convicted of a crime involving theft or fraud that is classified as a felony; or

Is subject to an order removing or suspending such individual from office, or prohibiting such individual's participation in the conduct of the affairs of any credit union, savings and loan association, bank, or other financial institution.

(1.2) A suspension or removal order issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include a description of the grounds for the suspension or removal. A copy of the order shall be sent to the association concerned and to each member of its board of directors.

The commissioner shall send written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any person affected by subsection (1) of this section, at least ten days prior to a hearing held pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., at which the commissioner shall preside.

If the commissioner determines that a specific case involves extraordinary circumstances which require immediate action, he may suspend or remove a person under subsection (1) of this section without notice or a hearing, but he shall conduct a hearing under section 24-4-105, C.R.S., within thirty days after such suspension or removal.

Any person who performs any duty or who exercises any power of a domestic savings and loan association after receipt of a suspension or removal order under subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the commissioner, any hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the commissioner be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from the institution.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 399, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 89:

(1) amended and (2)(d) added, p. 612, §§ 6, 7, effective April 19.

L. 94:

(1) amended and (1.2) added, p. 67, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1471, § 41, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3151, § 126, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(c), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

11-44-107. Confidentiality.

Neither the commissioner, the commissioner's deputy, nor any other person appointed by the commissioner shall divulge any information acquired in the discharge of the person's duties; except that:

A person specified in the introductory portion to this subsection (1) may divulge information acquired in the discharge of the person's duties if doing so is made necessary by law or under order of court in an action involving the division of financial services or in criminal actions;

Any party entitled to appear in a hearing on an application for a savings and loan association charter or approval of a merger of savings and loan associations shall have access to the applicant's proposed articles or amended articles of incorporation, application for charter, and proposed bylaws;

The commissioner may furnish information as to the condition of a savings and loan association to the federal office of thrift supervision or its successors, a federal home loan bank, the savings and loan departments of other states, an insurer authorized to insure obligations or accounts pursuant to articles 40 to 47 of this title, the executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, or the division of banking;

The commissioner may give records or information in the commissioner's possession to a licensing agency within the department of regulatory agencies relating to possible misconduct by a person or entity licensed by said agency;

The board, the commissioner, and their respective designees may exchange information obtained by the division of financial services as to possible criminal violations of law relating to the activities of a savings and loan association with the appropriate law enforcement agencies; and

Notwithstanding any provision contained in this article to the contrary, the commissioner, the commissioner's deputies, or other persons appointed by the commissioner may disclose any information in the records of the division of financial services or acquired in the discharge of the person's duties that is available from the federal office of thrift supervision or its successors or the disclosure of which has been specifically authorized by the board of directors of the association to which such information relates. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the board of directors of an association to waive any privileges that belong solely to the financial services board, the division of financial services, or its employees.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 336, § 6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-7.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 432, § 9, effective June 19.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 381, § 10, effective May 11.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 400, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 617, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1452, § 10, effective June 6.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1012, § 6, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 180, § 2, effective August 5.

11-44-108. Seal of commissioner. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 33:

p. 337, § 7.

CSA:

C. 25, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-8.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 618, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 68, § 14, effective July 1.

11-44-109. Examination by commissioner - procedure - penalty.

The commissioner, in person or by his deputy or one or more of his or her employees, at such intervals as the commissioner shall determine to be necessary or desirable in order to ascertain that each association is conducting its business in a safe and authorized manner, shall visit the home office and such branch offices as the commissioner deems necessary and examine into the affairs of every domestic association doing business in this state. The commissioner's deputy or any employee of the commissioner, before being entitled to make such examination, shall produce under the hand and seal of the commissioner his or her authority to make such examination. The commissioner and his deputy have the power to administer oaths and to examine under oath any director, officer, employee, or agent of any association concerning the business and affairs thereof. If the association has neither been audited by a registered or certified public accountant, in such manner and by auditors satisfactory to the commissioner, within the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of such examination or within the period that has elapsed since such last preceding examination, whichever is greater, nor adopted and maintained an internal audit program acceptable to the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor and the division, the examination by the division shall include an audit. The cost, as computed by the division, of any such audit shall be paid by the association audited; except that there shall be no charge by the division for making an audit when such audit has been made by reason of collaboration as provided in section 11-41-117.

(1.5) In lieu of making his or her own examination, the commissioner may accept the examination report prepared by the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor or other appropriate regulatory authority.

When, in the judgment of the commissioner, the condition of any association renders it necessary or expedient to make an extra examination or to devote any such extraordinary attention to its affairs, the commissioner has authority to make any extra examinations and to devote any necessary extra attention to the conduct of its affairs and may cause a registered or certified public accountant, appointed by the commissioner, to make an audit or examination of such association's business and affairs. In any such case, the association shall pay a reasonable fee based on actual cost to be affixed by the commissioner for all such extra services rendered by the division or by such accountant. A copy of the commissioner's report on each examination must be furnished to the association examined, and each director must note thereon that he has read the same.

The commissioner or his deputy shall annually examine into the affairs of every foreign association doing business in this state, and for every such examination made outside this state a reasonable expense and the actual traveling expenses incurred shall be paid by the association so examined. If the commissioner deems it necessary, he may cause a public accountant, appointed by the commissioner, to make an audit or examination of such association's business and affairs, and, in any such case, such association shall pay a reasonable price to be fixed by the commissioner for such extra services rendered by such accountant. Should any foreign association fail to pay the costs incurred in any such examination, such costs shall be paid by the state treasurer upon the order of the commissioner, and the amount so paid shall be a first lien upon all the assets and property of such association and may be recovered by suit by the attorney general on behalf of the state of Colorado and restored to the fund from which paid.

For the purpose of the examinations provided for in this section, the commissioner and his deputy or any other person authorized by him to make the examination has free access to all books and papers of the association which relate to its business and to the books and papers kept by any officer, agent, or employee relating thereto or upon which any record of its business is kept and may summon witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations in the examination of the directors, officers, agents, or employees of any such association or any other person in relation to its affairs, transactions, and conditions. He may require and compel the production of records, books, papers, contracts, or other documents by court action if necessary.

Any person who knowingly or willfully testifies falsely in reference to any matter material to said examination is guilty of perjury in the second degree and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished accordingly; and any person who willfully refuses or fails to attend, answer, or produce books or papers, or who refuses to give said commissioner or the commissioner's deputy or the person authorized by the commissioner full and truthful information and answer in writing to any inquiry or question made in writing by said commissioner or deputy or the person authorized by the commissioner in regard to the business carried on by such association or other matters under investigation, or who refuses or willfully fails to appear and testify under oath before the commissioner, the commissioner's deputy, or the person authorized by the commissioner commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of any association who knowingly or willfully makes any false certificate, entry, or memorandum upon any of the books or the papers of any association or upon any statement filed or offered to be filed in the division of financial services of this state or used in the course of any examination, inquiry, or investigation, with the intent to deceive the commissioner, the commissioner's deputy, or any person employed or appointed by the commissioner to make such examination, inquiry, or investigation commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 337, § 8.

CSA:

C. 25, § 54.

L. 39:

p. 250, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 122-6-9.

L. 55:

p. 765, § 1.

L. 57:

p. 650, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-5-9.

L. 69:

p. 1021, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 1147, § 5.

L. 72:

p. 567, § 44.

L. 84:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 381, § 11, effective May 11.

L. 89:

(6) amended, p. 618, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) and (1.5) amended, pp. 151, 140, §§ 60, 24, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5) and (6) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3151, § 127, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.